Utah statutes.
31A-26-103.   Workers' compensation claims.

In addition to being subject to this and other chapters of this title, insurers writing workers' compensation insurance in this state, including the Workers' Compensation Fund created under Chapter 33, are subject to the Labor Commission with respect to claims for and payment of compensation and benefits.

